Washington statutes.
RCW 36.69.120

Commissioners—Duties.

The park and recreation district board of commissioners shall:

(1) Elect its officers including a chair, vice chair, secretary, and such other officers as it may determine it requires;

(2) Hold regular public meetings at least monthly;

(3) Adopt policies governing transaction of board business, keeping of records, resolutions, transactions, findings and determinations, which shall be of public record;

(4) Initiate, direct and administer district park and recreation activities, and select and employ such properly qualified employees as it may deem necessary.

[ 2009 c 549 s 4103; 1963 c 4 s 36.69.120. Prior: 1957 c 58 s 12.]